Utah statutes.
32B-4-423.   Immunity regarding alcohol consumption offenses when seeking emergency aid for another person.

(1)  A law enforcement officer may not cite or arrest a person solely because of a person's violation of a provision under Subsection (2) if the officer came into contact with the person because:

(a)  the person had requested or acted in concert with another person to request emergency medical assistance for a third party who reasonably appeared to be in need of medical care due to the consumption of alcohol;

(b)  the officer was responding to the request for emergency medical assistance;

(c)  the person provided to the officer the person's name and identifying information as requested by the officer;

(d)  the person remained at the location where the third party was located until emergency medical response personnel arrived at the location; and

(e)  the person cooperated with the emergency medical assistance personnel and law enforcement officers at the location.

(2)  Offenses referred to in Subsection (1) are violations of:

(a)  Section 32B-4-403 regarding the unlawful sale, offer for sale, or furnishing of alcohol to a minor;

(b)  Subsection 32B-4-409(1) regarding the unlawful purchase, possession, or consumption of alcohol by a minor; and

(c)  Subsection 76-9-701(1) regarding intoxication when the offense involves consumption of alcohol.

(3)  An officer who declines to cite or arrest a person while acting in good faith under Subsection (1) is not civilly liable.



Enacted by Chapter 169, 2013 General Session

